Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 34 Construction Indemnity Agreements

6-34-1.
Construction indemnity agreements.

A covenant, promise, agreement, or understanding in, or in connection with or collateral to, a contract or agreement relative to the design, planning, construction, alteration, repair, or maintenance of a building, structure, highway, road, appurtenance, and appliance, including moving, demolition, and excavating connected with a building, structure, highway, road, appurtenance, or appliance, pursuant to which contract or agreement the promisee or the promisee’s independent contractors, agents, or employees has hired the promisor to perform work, purporting to indemnify the promisee, the promisee’s independent contractors, agents, employees, or indemnitees against liability for damages arising out of bodily injury to persons or damage to property proximately caused by or resulting from the negligence of the promisee, the promisee’s independent contractors, agents, employees, or indemnitees, is against public policy and is void; provided that this section shall not affect the validity of any insurance contract, worker’s compensation agreement, or an agreement issued by an insurer.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit any person from purchasing insurance for his or her own protection or from purchasing a construction bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 247, § 1.